trunk/apertium-eo-es/apertium-eo-es.eo.dix
<pardef n="i__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>i</l>         <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>as</l>        <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>is</l>        <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>os</l>        <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>us</l>        <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>us</l>        <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>ita</l>       <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ita</l>       <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>itaj</l>      <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>itan</l>      <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>itajn</l>     <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>ita</l>       <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sp"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>itan</l>      <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sp"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ata</l>       <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="ppres"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ataj</l>      <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="ppres"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>atan</l>      <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="ppres"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>atajn</l>     <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="ppres"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>ata</l>       <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="ppres"/><s n="sp"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>atan</l>      <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="ppres"/><s n="sp"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>onta</l>      <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp2"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>onta</l>      <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ontaj</l>     <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>inta</l>      <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp3"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>inta</l>      <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>inta</l>      <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp3"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>intaj</l>     <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ante</l>      <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>inte</l>      <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="gerpast"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>u</l>         <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>ita</l>       <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>itaj</l>      <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>ita</l>       <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>ata</l>       <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="ppres"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>ataj</l>      <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="ppres"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>ata</l>       <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="ppres"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>igi</l>       <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="igi"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>igas</l>      <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="igi"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>igis</l>      <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="igi"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>igos</l>      <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="igi"/><s n="fti"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>igus</l>      <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="igi"/><s n="cni"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>igus</l>      <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="igi"/><s n="fts"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>igita</l>     <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="igi"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>igita</l>     <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="igi"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>igitaj</l>    <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="igi"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>igitan</l>    <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="igi"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>igitajn</l>   <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="igi"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>igita</l>     <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="igi"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sp"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>igitan</l>    <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="igi"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sp"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>igata</l>     <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="igi"/><s n="ppres"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>igataj</l>    <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="igi"/><s n="ppres"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>igatan</l>    <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="igi"/><s n="ppres"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>igatajn</l>   <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="igi"/><s n="ppres"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>igata</l>     <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="igi"/><s n="ppres"/><s n="sp"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>igatan</l>    <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="igi"/><s n="ppres"/><s n="sp"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>igonta</l>    <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="igi"/><s n="pp2"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>igonta</l>    <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="igi"/><s n="pp2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>igontaj</l>   <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="igi"/><s n="pp2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iginta</l>    <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="igi"/><s n="pp3"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iginta</l>    <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="igi"/><s n="pp3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>igintaj</l>   <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="igi"/><s n="pp3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>igante</l>    <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="igi"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iginte</l>    <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="igi"/><s n="gerpast"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>igu</l>       <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="igi"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>igita</l>     <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="igi"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>igitaj</l>    <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="igi"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>igita</l>     <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="igi"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>igata</l>     <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="igi"/><s n="ppres"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>igataj</l>    <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="igi"/><s n="ppres"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>igata</l>     <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="igi"/><s n="ppres"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>iĝi</l>       <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="iĝi"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iĝas</l>      <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="iĝi"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iĝis</l>      <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="iĝi"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iĝos</l>      <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="iĝi"/><s n="fti"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iĝus</l>      <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="iĝi"/><s n="cni"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>iĝus</l>      <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="iĝi"/><s n="fts"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>iĝinta</l>     <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="iĝi"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iĝinta</l>     <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="iĝi"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iĝintaj</l>    <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="iĝi"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iĝintan</l>    <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="iĝi"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iĝintajn</l>   <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="iĝi"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>iĝinta</l>     <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="iĝi"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sp"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>iĝintan</l>    <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="iĝi"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sp"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iĝanta</l>     <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="iĝi"/><s n="ppres"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iĝantaj</l>    <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="iĝi"/><s n="ppres"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>

<e lm="abundi">            <i>abund</i><par n="i__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="afiŝi">            <i>afiŝ</i><par n="i__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="agrafi">            <i>agraf</i><par n="i__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="akumuli">            <i>akumul</i><par n="i__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="alparoli">            <i>alparol</i><par n="i__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="amori">            <i>amor</i><par n="i__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="antaŭdetermini">            <i>antaŭdetermin</i><par n="i__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="apozicii">            <i>apozici</i><par n="i__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="ascendi">            <i>ascend</i><par n="i__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="atribui">            <i>atribu</i><par n="i__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="bagateli">            <i>bagatel</i><par n="i__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="bicikli">            <i>bicikl</i><par n="i__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="bojkoti">            <i>bojkot</i><par n="i__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="celebri">            <i>celebr</i><par n="i__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="damludi">            <i>damlud</i><par n="i__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="defraŭdi">            <i>defraŭd</i><par n="i__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="delegi">            <i>deleg</i><par n="i__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="destini">            <i>destin</i><par n="i__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="diafragmi">            <i>diafragm</i><par n="i__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="diski">            <i>disk</i><par n="i__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="duonvidi">            <i>duonvid</i><par n="i__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="elbruli">            <i>elbrul</i><par n="i__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="engaĝi">            <i>engaĝ</i><par n="i__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="fantazii">            <i>fantazi</i><par n="i__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="flankelasi">            <i>flankelas</i><par n="i__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="frakcii">            <i>frakci</i><par n="i__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="gapi">            <i>gap</i><par n="i__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="graŭli">            <i>graŭl</i><par n="i__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="hidri">            <i>hidr</i><par n="i__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="impulsi">            <i>impuls</i><par n="i__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="injekti">            <i>injekt</i><par n="i__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="inundi">            <i>inund</i><par n="i__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="kalcitri">            <i>kalcitr</i><par n="i__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="kidnapi">            <i>kidnap</i><par n="i__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="kolazioni">            <i>kolazion</i><par n="i__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="koncipi">            <i>koncip</i><par n="i__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="konsulti">            <i>konsult</i><par n="i__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="koregrafii">            <i>koregrafi</i><par n="i__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="kunprodukti">            <i>kunprodukt</i><par n="i__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="linĉi">            <i>linĉ</i><par n="i__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="malkodi">            <i>malkod</i><par n="i__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="marĝeni">            <i>marĝen</i><par n="i__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="moduli">            <i>modul</i><par n="i__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="niti">            <i>nit</i><par n="i__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="oscili">            <i>oscil</i><par n="i__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="penindi">            <i>penind</i><par n="i__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="platpremi">            <i>platprem</i><par n="i__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="printi">            <i>print</i><par n="i__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="psalmi">            <i>psalm</i><par n="i__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="refrakti">            <i>refrakt</i><par n="i__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="repopoli">            <i>repopol</i><par n="i__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="rezulti">            <i>rezult</i><par n="i__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="sapumi">            <i>sapum</i><par n="i__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="sinki">            <i>sink</i><par n="i__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="spioni">            <i>spion</i><par n="i__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="stoki">            <i>stok</i><par n="i__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="sulki">            <i>sulk</i><par n="i__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="toksi">            <i>toks</i><par n="i__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="trompoŝteli">            <i>trompoŝtel</i><par n="i__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="verdikti">            <i>verdikt</i><par n="i__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="ĉefroli">            <i>ĉefrol</i><par n="i__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="ŝpati">            <i>ŝpat</i><par n="i__vblex"/></e>
